Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,146
Farm trucks; registration fees.

(1) For the registration of farm trucks, except for trucks or combinations of trucks or truck-tractors and trailers having a gross vehicle weight exceeding sixteen tons, the registration fee shall be eighteen dollars for up to and including five tons gross vehicle weight, and in excess of five tons the fee shall be twenty-two dollars.

(2) For a truck or a combination of a truck or truck-tractor and trailer weighing in excess of sixteen tons registered as a farm truck, except as provided in sections 60-3,111 and 60-3,151, the registration fee shall be based upon the gross vehicle weight. The registration fee on such trucks weighing in excess of sixteen tons shall be at the following rates: For a gross weight in excess of sixteen tons up to and including twenty tons, forty dollars plus five dollars for each ton of gross weight over seventeen tons, and for gross weight exceeding twenty tons, sixty-five dollars plus ten dollars for each ton of gross weight over twenty tons.

(3) Farm truck license plates shall display, in addition to the registration number, the designation farm and the words NOT FOR HIRE.

(4) Farm trucks with a gross weight of over sixteen tons license plates shall also display the weight that such farm truck is licensed for, using a decal on the license plates in letters and numerals of such size and design as shall be determined and issued by the department.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 146.